Hawaii statutes.
§187A-5 Rules. Subject to chapter 91,
the department shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules for and concerning the
protection and propagation of introduced and transplanted aquatic life, or the
conservation and allocation of the natural supply of aquatic life in any area.
The rules may include the following:

(1) Size limits;

(2) Bag limits;

(3) Open and closed fishing seasons;

(4) Specifications and numbers of fishing or taking
gear which may be used or possessed; and

(5) Prescribe and limit the kind and amount of bait
that may be used in taking aquatic life, and the conditions for entry into
areas for taking aquatic life.

The rules may vary from one county to another and
may specify certain days of the week or certain hours of the day in designating
open seasons. All rules shall have the force and effect of law. Any person
who violates any of the rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be guilty
of a petty misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished as
provided by section 188-70. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Method is
Irrelevant: Allowing Native Hawaiian Traditional and Customary Subsistence
Fishing to Thrive. 32 UH L. Rev. 203.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next